Hawaii statutes.
§199-6 Failure to obey a summons. Any
person who fails to appear at the place and within the time specified in the
summons or citation issued by the officers or their agents or subordinates,
upon that person's arrest for violation of title 12, chapters 6D, 6E, and 6K,
and rules adopted thereunder, shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and, upon
conviction, shall be fined not more than $500 or be imprisoned not more than
thirty days, or both.

If any person fails to comply with a summons or
citation issued, or if any person fails or refuses to deposit bail as required
and within the time permitted, the officers shall cause a complaint to be
entered against the person and secure the issuance of a warrant for the
person's arrest.

When a complaint is made to any prosecuting
officer of the violation of title 12, chapters 6D, 6E, and 6K, and rules
adopted thereunder, the officer who issued the summons or citation shall
subscribe to it under oath administered by another official or officials of the
department of land and natural resources whose names have been submitted to the
prosecuting officer and who have been designated by the chairperson of the
board of land and natural resources to administer the same. [L 1978, c 171, pt
of §1; am L 1981, c 85, §114; gen ch 1985, 1993; am L 1997, c 17, §3; am L
2004, c 142, §13]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next